Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-135
Prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

Any person who aids, abets, incites, compels, or coerces any activity prohibited by the provisions of sections 20-132 to 20-143, or who attempts to do so, shall be guilty of discriminatory practice and shall be subject to the penalties of sections 20-132 to 20-143.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 4.